Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.170

Notification of restoration rights.

Upon termination for reasons other than retirement, the department shall inform a member withdrawing his or her contributions, and the member shall acknowledge in writing, of the right to restore such contributions upon reestablishment of membership in the respective retirement system and the requirements involved in such restoration.

[ 1994 c 197 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.